Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 7 Charitable, Educational, Religious and Other Societies

Cross references. —

As to prohibition against appropriation of moneys for sectarian or religious societies or institutions, see art. 1, § 19, Wyo. Const.

As to mutual and cooperative associations, see art. 10, § 10, Wyo. Const.

As to partition of property of religious societies or corporations, see §§

1-32-120

and

1-32-121

.

As to sale of property given or purchased for religious use, see §§

1-32-310

and

1-32-311

.

As to child-caring facilities, see chapter 4 of title 14.

As to inapplicability of minimum wage law to individuals engaged in activities of educational, charitable, religious or nonprofit organizations, see §

27-4-201

.

As to exemption from payment of license fees in connection with exhibitions and circuses, see §

33-6-101

.

As to validation of conveyances to religious and educational uses, see §§

34-5-114

through

34-5-117

.

As to effect of recording of townsite plat on premises dedicated to charitable, religious or educational purposes, see §

34-12-104

.

As to sanitation of public institutions, see §

35-1-102

.

As to setting aside of Saratoga Hot Springs state reserve for the treatment and care of diseases and for sanitary, charitable and other purposes, see §

36-8-402

.

As to free or reduced rates of transportation, see §

37-3-105

.

As to exemption of property from taxation, see §

39-11-105

.

As to exemption from sales tax and use tax, see §§

39-15-105

and

39-16-105

, respectively.